Virginia statutes. Title 55.1. Property and Conveyances.
Article 3. Protection of Purchasers.
§ 55.1-2222.
Possibility of reverter.

A possibility of reverter contained in a reverter deed for a time-share estate subject to reverter is valid, is enforceable in law and in equity, and shall operate to transfer title to the time-share estate from each grantee in such deed back to the developer, provided that the following conditions are satisfied:

The reverter deed from the developer contains the possibility of reverter by insertion of the language required by subsection E;

A grantee in the reverter deed is in default and has been provided after such default with at least two written notices to this effect with no less than a 10-calendar day right to cure in each notice;

A grantee in the reverter deed has been provided with no less than 30 calendar days within which to cure the default before exercise of the possibility of reverter occurs;

At the time of exercise of the possibility of reverter, the developer is the sole holder of the note and the sole beneficiary under the deed of trust;

The exercise by the developer of the possibility of reverter is evidenced by an affidavit duly recorded where the reverter deed was recorded that contains the following information:

A description of the time-share project and time-share estate and a statement that, upon recordation of the affidavit, title to such time-share estate reverts back to the developer;

A description and recitation of the reverter deed that contained the possibility of reverter and a reference of when and where such deed was recorded and its recording information;

A recitation that the purchaser defaulted in or violated a consumer document and failed to cure such default or violation within a period of no less than 30 calendar days;

A description of the note and deed of trust with a recitation that (i) the developer is the sole holder of the note and the sole beneficiary under the deed of trust, (ii) such note is canceled and declared void, and (iii) such deed of trust is automatically released;

A recitation that such purchaser’s rights and entitlements in the time-share estate, the time-share project, and the time-share program are extinguished effective the date of recordation of the affidavit;

The signature of a duly authorized representative of the developer verified under oath as to its truth of the statements contained in such affidavit; and

The recordation of the affidavit referred to in subdivision A 5 shall automatically:

Transfer title to the time-share estate from each grantee in the reverter deed to the developer without the need of a deed to the developer or consent from such grantee;

Declare null and void and act as an automatic release of the deed of trust or mortgage given by such grantee to finance a portion of the purchase price of the time-share estate with no deficiency resulting;

Void and act as an automatic release of any debt from such grantee to the developer arising out of the purchase or financing of the time-share estate as evidenced by the note; and

Extinguish any ownership or other property right or entitlements such grantee has in and to the time-share estate, the time-share project, and the time-share program.

The clerk of the court shall record such affidavit in the land books where the time-share project is located, indexing the purchaser in the grantor indices and the developer in the grantee indices. For indexing purposes only, the purchaser shall be referred to as the grantor and the developer as the grantee. The cost of recording the affidavit shall be limited to the clerk’s fee only.

In the exercise of the possibility of reverter, the developer shall be liable to the purchaser for the developer’s failure to comply with the provisions of this section; however, such failure shall not operate to defeat or diminish the transfer of title to the time-share estate from each grantee in the reverter deed to the developer upon recordation of the affidavit referred to in subdivision A 5. The developer’s liability shall be limited to the amount paid by such purchaser toward the purchase price of the time-share estate, exclusive of interest and closing costs but without offset for the purchaser’s utilization of the time-share program. The court shall award court costs and reasonable attorney fees to the prevailing party.

The reverter deed shall contain the following statement in order to possess the possibility of reverter. The opening phrase shall be in 10-point boldface type as follows:“Loss of Time-Share Estate. Developer has inserted into this deed a ”possibility of reverter.“ By this concept, should a grantee of this reverter deed default in or violate an obligation imposed by a consumer document for a period of at least 60 days and fail to cure such violation or default within no less than 30 calendar days thereafter, title to the time-share will revert back to the developer upon the developer recording an affidavit to this effect where this reverter deed is recorded. Only the developer can elect to exercise the possibility of reverter. Each grantee in this reverter deed will be sent at least two notices of default or violation within the 30-day period with no less than 10 days to cure in each instance. The notice will be sent to the address of each grantee maintained at the office of the developer or the association. After the cure period has lapsed and the developer records the affidavit, title to the time-share estate will automatically vest in the developer and any note executed by the grantee will be deemed canceled and any recorded deed of trust securing such note shall be automatically released. The possibility of reverter will itself lapse and become null and void at the soonest to occur of the following: (i) the deed of trust is released of record, (ii) a statement that the deed of trust is released of record is executed and recorded by the developer with a date of when the possibility of reverter was or is to lapse, or (iii) when the time-share program terminates pursuant to either the Virginia Real Estate Time-Share Act or the time-share instrument which created such program.”

The filing of the affidavit referred to in subdivision A 5 shall not result in the requirement of any filing under Chapter 12 (§

64.2-1200

et seq.) of Title 64.2.

Any possibility of reverter not otherwise exercised by the developer pursuant to this section shall itself lapse and become null and void at the soonest to occur of the following: (i) the deed of trust is released of record, (ii) a statement that the deed of trust is released of record is executed and recorded by the developer with a date of when the possibility of reverter was or is to lapse, or (iii) when the time-share program terminates pursuant to either this chapter or the time-share instrument.

In exercising the possibility of reverter, the developer shall be entitled to retain as liquidated damages all moneys paid by the purchaser in conformity with any consumer document.

The exercise of the possibility of reverter shall not operate to diminish or eliminate (i) any debt of the purchaser to the time-share association or other third party occasioned by ownership of the time-share estate or participation in the time-share program or (ii) any recorded lien junior in priority to the deed of trust lien referred to in this section.

6.

A copy of the recorded affidavit described in subdivision A 5 is sent by the developer to each purchaser at his address as maintained by the developer or the association, along with the statement from the developer explaining the consequences of such affidavit with emphasis on subdivisions A 5 a, d, and e.

History.

2004, c. 143, § 55-376.1; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2223.
Recording and delivery of deed.

At such time as the time-share estate purchaser has fulfilled all of his obligations under the contract and is entitled to a deed for his time-share estate, the developer shall file or cause to be filed within 180 days after such date, with the clerk of the circuit court where the time-share project is located, such deed for recordation. Upon receipt of the recorded deed returned from the clerk’s office, the developer shall, within 45 days after such receipt, send or cause to be sent the original deed to the time-share estate purchaser.

History.

2006, c. 653, § 55-376.2; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2224.
Liability limited; liability actions prohibited.

Except as provided in subsection B, a project professional is not liable for injury to or death of a participant resulting from the inherent risks of project activity, so long as the warning contained in §

55.1-2225

is posted as required. Except as provided in subsection B, no participant or participant’s representative may maintain an action against or recover from a project professional for injury, loss, damage, or death of the participant resulting exclusively from any of the inherent risks of project activity, provided that in any action for damages against a project professional for a project activity, the project professional shall plead the affirmative defense of assumption of the inherent risks of project activity by the participant.

Nothing in subsection A shall prevent or limit the liability of a project professional if the project professional does any one or more of the following:

Commits an act or omission that constitutes negligence or willful or wanton disregard for the safety of the participant, and that act or omission proximately causes injury, damage, or death to the participant;

Has actual knowledge or reasonably should have known of a dangerous condition on the land or in the facilities or equipment used in the project activity, or the dangerous propensity of a particular animal used in such activity, and does not make the danger known to the participant, and the danger proximately causes injury, damage, or death to the participant; or

Intentionally injures the participant.

Any limitation on legal liability afforded by this section to a project professional is in addition to any other limitations of legal liability otherwise provided by law.

History.

2007, c. 267, § 55-376.3; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2225.
Warning required.

The developer, association, or other project professional shall post and maintain signs that contain the warning notice specified in subsection B. One sign shall be placed in a clearly visible location at the entrance to the project and another at the site of the project activity. The warning notice shall consist of a sign in black letters, with each letter to be a minimum of one inch in height. Every written contract entered into by a project professional for the providing of professional services, instruction, or the rental of equipment to a participant, whether or not the contract involves project activities on or off the time-share project or at the site of the project activity, shall contain in clearly readable print the warning notice specified in subsection B.

The signs and contracts described in subsection A shall contain the following notice of warning:“WARNING: Under Virginia law, there is no liability for an injury to or death of a participant in a project activity conducted at this location if such injury or death results from the inherent risks of project activity. Inherent risks of project activity include, among others, risks of injury inherent to land, equipment, and animals, as well as the potential for you to act in a negligent manner that may contribute to your injury or death. You are assuming the inherent risks of participating in this project activity.”

Failure to comply with the requirements concerning warning signs and notices provided in this section shall prevent a project professional from invoking the privileges of immunity provided by this chapter.

History.

2007, c. 267, § 55-376.4; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2226.
Buyer’s Acknowledgment.

Prior to the execution of a purchase contract, a purchaser shall be given a separate written document, titled “Buyer’s Acknowledgment,” to be signed by the purchaser and a representative of the developer other than the salesperson for the transaction.

The Buyer’s Acknowledgment shall contain the following:

The name and address of the developer;

The name and address of the time-share project;

Whether the developer currently offers a resale or rental program or a buy-back program; and

The following statement in at least 10-point boldface type:“There is no assurance that a purchaser may resell a time-share for a certain price or on particular terms. By signing below, purchaser acknowledges that this purchase is (i) for personal use and enjoyment and not for commercial or investment purposes and (ii) not being made based upon any representation that the time-share has any future market value or resale potential.”

History.

2012, c. 751, § 55-376.5; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2227.
Resale of time-shares.

In the event of any resale of a time-share by a time-share owner, other than the developer, such owner shall obtain from the developer or managing agent in the case of a time-share use program or from the time-share estate owners’ association in the case of a time-share estate program, and furnish to the purchaser prior to settlement on an executed agreement to purchase the time-share, a certificate of resale that shall include the following:

A statement disclosing the effect on the proposed transfer of any right of first refusal or other restraint on transfer of the time-share or any portion of such time-share;

A copy of the time-share instrument;

A copy of the current bylaws and rules and regulations of the time-share estate owners’ association, if any, and the amendments to such bylaws, rules, or regulations;

A copy of the current annual report prepared pursuant to §

55.1-2213

;

A statement setting forth the amount of any expense liability and unpaid time-share expense or special assessment currently due and payable from the selling time-share owner, including the disclosures of any liens against the time-share due to the nonpayment of such fees or charges;

A statement of the nature and status of any known and pending actions or judgments against the developer, managing entity, or time-share owners’ association with reference to the time-share project; and

A copy of a Buyer’s Acknowledgment form required by §

55.1-2226

.

The developer, managing agent, or such officer of the time-share owners’ association as the bylaws may specify shall furnish the certificate of resale prescribed by subsection A upon the written request of any purchaser within 30 days of the receipt of such request. Payment of the reasonable costs of preparing the certificate may be required as a prerequisite to the issuance of the certificate, but such fee shall not exceed $50.

A time-share owner providing a certificate pursuant to subsection A is not liable to the purchaser for any erroneous information included in the certificate, other than for judgment liens against the time-share being sold.

A purchaser is not liable for any unpaid time-share expense liability or fee greater than the amount set forth in the certificate prepared in conformity with subsection A. A time-share owner is not liable to a purchaser for the failure or delay of the provider to provide the certificate in a timely manner, but the purchase contract is voidable by the purchaser until the certificate has been provided and for five days after the certificate has been provided or until transfer, whichever occurs first.

All rights of redress of a purchaser against a selling time-share owner, the developer, the managing agent, or the association for the failure to obtain or receive the statement required by subsection A are conclusively waived upon settlement on the time-share occurring.

The responsibilities imposed by this section on the developer, managing agent, time-share estate owners’ association, or selling time-share owner shall not be waived.

History.

1981, c. 462, § 55-380; 1985, c. 517; 1989, c. 637; 1994, c. 580; 1998, c. 460; 2012, c. 751; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2228.
Required resale disclosures.

In addition to the requirements of §

55.1-2242

, before receiving anything of value for providing or offering to provide a resale service, a reseller shall disclose in writing to the owner of a resale time-share:

The name and permanent business address of the reseller;

A commencement and transaction date for such resale service;

The names and addresses of any affiliates and the primary website address used by the reseller and such affiliates to be used to promote the resale time-share;

Whether the reseller’s rights are exclusive and, if so, the scope of such rights and length of the exclusivity period;

Whether any person, other than the owner, may occupy, rent, exchange, or use the resale time-share during the resale service;

The name of any person other than the owner who will receive any rent or other consideration from the use of the resale time-share during the resale service;

A description of each resale service to be provided and the fees, costs, or commissions for each;

A description sufficient to identify the resale time-share;

The jurisdiction issuing the license for any services by a licensed real estate broker or salesperson; and

The following in at least 10-point boldface type:

The ratio of (i) the number of resale time-shares listed for sale to the number of resale time-shares actually sold by the reseller for each of the past two calendar years or (ii) the total amount of advance fees collected compared with the total amount of fees and commissions received by the reseller upon sale of resale time-shares for the past two calendar years, followed by this statement: “Do not rely on past performance as an indicator of the likelihood of sale of your time-share.”; and

If the retail service is limited to the placement of advertisements, this statement: “There is no guarantee that you will sell your time-share at all or within any period of time by placing this advertisement. Our only obligation to you is to post your advertisement on our website for the agreed length of time and forward all inquiries we receive to you.”

A resale transfer contract shall include the following disclosures by the reseller:

The disclosures required by subdivisions A 1 through 7;

A description legally sufficient for the transfer of the resale time-share;

A description of the document by which the owner is to (i) grant rights in the resale time-share to the reseller or any other person, including a power of attorney or similar document, and (ii) transfer the resale time-share to a subsequent purchaser;

Any fees or costs the time-share owner is required to pay or reimburse to the reseller or transfer company to complete the transfer;

The date by which the transfer of the resale time-share from the owner to the reseller, a third person, or a subsequent purchaser will be completed, not to exceed 180 days from the effective date of the resale transfer contract;

If the resale time-share will be transferred to a transferee other than a subsequent purchaser, the contact information of such transferee;

A statement that the reseller will (i) provide the owner written evidence of transfer of the resale time-share to a subsequent purchaser within 30 days of such transfer and (ii) send notice of the transfer to the association and managing entity of the time-share program for the resale transfer and any exchange company in which the resale time-share was enrolled; and

The following statements in 10-point boldface type:

“No later than 180 days from the date of this agreement, we will transfer your time-share to another person. If transfer does not occur within that period, we will pay or reimburse to you the cost of ownership of your time-share for that period. If we breach our agreement, you will continue to be responsible for such cost of ownership.”; and

“Your time-share may be sold at any price by us without your approval. If sold for a price in excess of our fee, we have no obligation to send you the excess.”

A resale purchase contract shall require the reseller to obtain the certificate of resale described in subsection A of §

55.1-2227

and shall also include the following:

A description legally sufficient for transfer of the resale time-share;

The name and address of the developer or managing agent for a time-share use project or the association for a time-share estate project;

Identification of the party responsible for notifying the developer, managing entity, association, or exchange company, as the case may be, of the transfer of the resale time-share;

Identification of the first year in which the subsequent purchaser is entitled to use and occupy the resale time-share; and

The following statement in 10-point boldface type: “A certificate of resale is required to be provided to you containing important documents concerning the time-share project for your review. Settlement waives the right to receipt of such information.”

History.

2012, c. 751, § 55-380.1; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2229.
Liens.

In the case of time-share estate transfers, unless the purchaser expressly agrees to take subject to or assume a lien prior to transferring a time-share estate other than by deed in lieu of foreclosure, the developer shall either (i) record or furnish to the purchaser as part of settlement releases of all liens affecting that time-share estate, or (ii) provide a surety bond or title insurance against the lien, as provided for liens on real estate in the Commonwealth.

Unless a time-share owner or his predecessor in title agrees otherwise with the lienor, if a lien other than an underlying mortgage or deed of trust becomes effective against more than one time-share in a time-share project, any time-share owner is entitled to a release of a time-share from the lien upon payment of the amount of the lien attributable to the time-share. The amount of the payment shall be proportionate to the ratio that the time-share owner’s liability bears to the liabilities of all time-share owners whose interests are subject to the lien. Upon receipt of payment, the lien-holder shall promptly deliver to the time-share owner a release of the lien covering that time-share. After payment, the managing entity may not assess or have a lien against that time-share for any portion of the expenses incurred in connection with that lien.

History.

1981, c. 462, § 55-381; 1991, c. 704; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2230.
Effect of violations on rights of action; attorney fees; prior determination of Common Interest Community Board required for certain violations.

If a developer or any other person subject to this chapter violates any provision of this chapter or any provision of the time-share instrument, any person or class of persons adversely affected by the violation has a claim for appropriate relief. The court may also award reasonable attorney fees to the prevailing party.

Prior to the commencement of any action alleging a failure to comply with the provisions of §

55.1-2220

or

55.1-2234

, however, an aggrieved owner shall first seek a determination from the Board as to whether compliance with §

55.1-2220

or

55.1-2234

has occurred. The Board shall make such determination within 120 days of the request for a determination.

History.

1981, c. 462, § 55-382; 1985, c. 517; 1998, c. 460; 2008, c. 376; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2231.
Statute of limitations; actions; limitation on rescission rights.

Except as otherwise provided in §

55.1-2237

, a judicial proceeding where the sufficiency of the time-share instrument, the accuracy of the public offering statement, or validity of any contract of purchase is in issue and a rescission of the contract or damages is sought shall be commenced within two years after the date of the contract of purchase, notwithstanding that the purchaser’s terms of payments may extend beyond this period of limitation; however, with respect to the enforcement of provisions in the contract of purchase that require the continued furnishing of services and the reciprocal payments to be made by the purchaser, the period of bringing a judicial proceeding shall continue for a period of two years for each breach.Rescission of the contract shall not be granted by the court unless (i) the inaccuracy of the public offering statement or the insufficiency of the time-share instrument directly and adversely affected the purchaser’s right to participate in the time-share program or to own his time-share or (ii) at the time of the contract, the developer has sold more time-shares than there are time-share units that have been completed or bonded to accommodate such sales. Further, if damages are awarded, the amount of the damages shall be limited to actual damages sustained.

If a developer has substantially complied in good faith with the provisions of this chapter, a nonmaterial error or omission shall not be actionable. A nonmaterial error or omission shall not be sufficient to permit a purchaser to cancel a contract after the cancellation period provided by §

55.1-2221

has expired.

History.

1981, c. 462, § 55-383; 2006, c. 653; 2008, c. 376; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2232.
Class actions.

No time-share owner can bring an action on behalf of other time-share owners unless he has received the written authorization to represent all other time-share owners within the project.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A, the association may bring an action on behalf of the time-share owners with the authorization of the time-share owners within the project upon the two-thirds majority vote of the board of directors, if such action is found to be in the best interest of the association.

For purposes of this section, the developer shall not be deemed a time-share owner and his written permission shall not be required.

History.

1981, c. 462, § 55-384; 1989, c. 637; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2233.
Financial records.

The person or entity responsible for either making or collecting common expense assessments or maintenance assessments shall keep detailed financial records. All financial and other records shall be made reasonably available at such person’s or entity’s office for examination by any time-share owner and his authorized agents.

History.

1981, c. 462, § 55-385; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2234.
Developer’s obligation to complete.

The developer shall complete all promised and incomplete units and common elements being offered and described in the time-share instrument and the public offering statement. The developer shall be excused for any period of delay in the completion of such promised units and common elements when delayed, hindered, or prevented from doing so by causes beyond the developer’s control, which shall include (i) labor disputes not caused by the developer; (ii) riots; (iii) civil commotion or insurrection; (iv) war or warlike operations; (v) governmental restrictions, regulations, or control; (vi) inability to obtain any materials or services; (vii) fire or other casualties; (viii) acts of God; or (ix) forces not under the control or supervision of the developer.

The developer shall file with the Board a payment and performance bond in the sum equal to 100 percent of the estimated cost of completing all promised and incomplete units and common elements comprising the time-share project described in the time-share instrument and the public offering statement. Such bond shall be conditioned upon the completion of such units and common elements in conformity with the plans and specifications for such improvements. The bond shall be with a surety company authorized to do business in the Commonwealth. The Board may accept cash or an irrevocable letter of credit in lieu of the bond required by this section. The Board shall be the sole determiner of the form, amount, content, obligee, and conditions of the letter of credit. Should it become necessary for the Board to call upon the letter of credit in order to assure completion of the improvements, the Board shall have the authority to petition a court of competent jurisdiction to appoint a receiver to administer such completion.

History.

1981, c. 462, § 55-386; 1983, c. 59; 1985, c. 517; 1994, c. 580; 1998, c. 460; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.